Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 51. State Depository for Public Documents

§ 25-51-1.
Designation of Mississippi Library Commission as state depository for public records; electronic form of publications as public record.

The Mississippi Library Commission, hereinafter referred to as the “commission,” shall be the state depository for the public records issued by any government agency for public distribution, including the annual report required under Section 27-101-1. Each agency publication shall be made available in an electronic form, and the electronic form shall constitute the public record. The record shall be placed on the official website of the commission. The libraries of state agencies, public junior colleges, colleges, public universities and public libraries located in the state may also become depositories of state agency publications that are available on the commission’s official website, when designated as such by the director of the commission upon the written request of the applicable government agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4228-21; Laws, 1966. ch. 555, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 429, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-51-3.
Agencies to furnish documents in electronic form for publication on commission website.

Each agency of state government shall furnish to the director of the commission the necessary information to provide its publications and public records in an electronic form for placement on the official website of the commission. The director of the commission shall transmit this information to each depository. These records shall be made accessible by the depository receiving them to any person desiring to examine the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4228-22; Laws, 1966, ch. 555, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 347, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 429, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-51-5.
Annual
lists of public documents.

Each agency of state government shall furnish annually to the director of the commission a list of all its publications made available for public distribution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4228-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 555, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 347, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 429, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-51-7.
Recorder of public documents.

A recorder of documents shall be appointed by the director of the commission in his office, whose functions shall be to administer the provisions of Sections 25-51-1 through 25-51-5, under the supervision of the director of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4228-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 555, § 4; Laws, 1975, ch. 347, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 429, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2012.